Hawaii statutes.
§142-18 Disposal of tuberculous animals.
The owner of all cattle reacting to the tuberculin test shall, subject to
section 142-16, cause them to be segregated immediately and, within a
reasonable time thereafter, to be delivered for slaughter at such time and
place as may be designated by the department of agriculture. The slaughter
shall be under the direct supervision of the department and in accordance with
the meat inspection regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture.
[L 1923, c 124, §3; RL 1925, §628; am L 1927, c 215, §1; RL 1935, §224; am L
1939, c 111, §2; RL 1945, §1078; RL 1955, §20-19; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am
L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-18; am L 1986, c 7, §1]

Case Notes

Section 142-18 does
not supersede §142-6. 69 H. 349, 742 P.2d 359.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next